California, session 20252026, AB1141.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 24801 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:24801. The government of every district is vested in a board of seven directors, elected from wards, together with the other officers mentioned in this part. The directors shall be residents and voters of the respective wards from which they are nominated.SEC. 2. Section 24826 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:24826. (a) The nomination paper for a director shall contain the name of the candidate and other information as may be required by this article. The nomination paper shall also meet either of the following requirements:(1) The nomination paper shall be signed by a minimum of 50 voters of the respective ward.(2) The nomination paper shall include a filing fee in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars ($150) in lieu of signatures.(b) All nomination papers shall be filed with, and all in-lieu fees shall be paid to, the county elections official in the county or counties in which the candidate is running.SEC. 3. Section 24827 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:24827. Nomination papers may be circulated throughout each ward.SEC. 4. Section 24830 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:24830. Candidates for the office of director shall be voted upon and elected one from each ward.SEC. 5. Section 24861 of the Public Utilities Code is repealed.SEC. 6. Section 24862 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:24862. At each biennial general election, a number of directors corresponding to the number whose terms of office expire shall be elected for the term of four years.SEC. 7. Section 24863 of the Public Utilities Code is repealed.SEC. 8. Section 24863 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:24863. (a) Effective with the November, 3, 2026, statewide general election, the terms of directors elected shall commence on December 5, 2026, and shall end at noon on January 6, 2031, upon their successors taking office, following the successors’ election in 2030.(b) Effective with the November 7, 2028, statewide general election, the terms of directors elected shall commence on December 1, 2028, and shall end at noon on January 3, 2033, upon their successors taking office, following the successors’ election in 2032.(c) On and after January 4, 2033, the terms of directors shall commence on the first Monday after the first day of January following their election.SEC. 9. Section 24908 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:24908. (a) The board may, by ordinance or resolution, provide that each director shall be paid a sum that shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each calendar month that they serve as a director. The board may, by ordinance or resolution, provide for an adjustment to the monthly compensation based upon the percentage increase in the California Consumer Price Index, as calculated by the Department of Finance, for the previous calendar year. The adjustment shall not become effective until the first day of the new fiscal year following the adoption of the ordinance or resolution.(b) The ordinance or resolution to authorize a monthly stipend pursuant to subdivision (a), in lieu of per-meeting compensation, shall include a requirement that a director may receive a monthly stipend for a given month only if the director attends all scheduled and noticed regular board meetings for that month. For those directors meeting this attendance requirement, the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) shall be deducted from the stipend for failure to attend each meeting of a committee on which the director serves that month. In any month that a director fails to meet these attendance requirements, that director may be compensated at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) per board or committee meeting attended, not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for that month.(c) For the purpose of this section, a director who misses a scheduled and noticed meeting of the board or committee while attending to official district business pursuant to authorization shall be deemed to have attended the meeting.(d) The ordinance or resolution may provide for not more than two excused absences during a calendar year without disqualifying the director for a monthly stipend.(e) In addition to the compensation otherwise provided in this section, each director may be allowed necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred solely as a result of the performance of their duties, in amounts as may be authorized by the board. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.SEC. 10. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.